Florida, session 2026, SB390.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 110.1185, Florida Statutes, is created 21 to read: 22 110.1185âAdministrative leave for living organ donation.â 23 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âliving organ donorâ 24 means a person who donates all or part of a human organ while he 25 or she is alive for transplantation into another person. 26 (2)âEach state agency shall grant administrative leave, 27 with pay, not to exceed 30 working days, to allow an employee to 28 serve as a living organ donor. Administrative leave granted 29 under this section is in addition to any medical, personal, or 30 other leave otherwise authorized by law. 31 Section 2.âSection 381.865, Florida Statutes, is created to 32 read: 33 381.865âLeave for living organ donation by employees of 34 private employers and local governments.â 35 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 36 (a)ââEmployerâ means a private employer, including a sole 37 proprietor, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, 38 or other entity, or a political subdivision of the state, that 39 employs one or more employees. 40 (b)ââLiving organ donorâ means a person who donates all or 41 part of a human organ while he or she is alive for 42 transplantation into another person. 43 (2)(a)âIn addition to any medical, personal, or other paid 44 leave provided by the employer, an employer shall grant an 45 employee an unpaid leave of absence to allow the employee to 46 serve as a living organ donor if the employee submits a written 47 request for such leave. 48 (b)âThe length of the leave of absence must be equal to the 49 time requested by the employee or 30 working days, whichever is 50 less. 51 (c)âAn employer may grant paid or unpaid leave for a period 52 longer than 30 working days. 53 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.